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DTC P0560 System Voltage

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The battery supplies electricity to the engine control ECU even when the ignition switch is OFF. This electric-
ity allows the engine control ECU store data such as DTC history, freeze frame data, fuel trim values, and
other data.
If the battery voltage falls below a minimum level, the engine control ECU will conclude that there is a fault
in the power supply circuit. The next time the engine starts, the engine control ECU will turn on the MIL and
a DTC will be set.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

P0560
Open in back up power source circuit
BATT is less than 3.5 V

SOpen inback −uppowersourcecircuit
SEFIorECDNo.1 fuse
SEnginecontrolECU

HINT:
If DTC P0560 present, the engine control ECU will not store another DTC.
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
Read freeze frame data using the hand−held tester. Freeze frame data records the engine conditions when
a malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting, freeze frame data can help determine if the vehicle was
running or stopped, if the engine was warmed up or not, if the air−fuel ratio was lean or rich, as well as other
data from the time when a malfunction occurred.

1 Check EFI or ECD No. 1 fuse of engine room J/B.

PREPARATION:
Remove the EFI or ECD No. 1 fuse from the engine room J/B.
CHECK:
Check the continuity of the EFI or ECD No. 1 fuse.
OK:

Continuity

NG Check for short in all harness and components
connected to EFI or ECD No. 1 fuse.

OK

2 Check voltage between terminal BATT and E1 of engine control ECU connector.

CHECK:
Measure the voltage between terminals of the E9 and E11 en-
gine control ECU connector.
OK:

Tester Connection Specified Condition

BATT(E11 −3) − E1(E9 −1) 9 to 14 V

OK Check for intermittent problems (See page
DI−3) .

NG
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3 Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine control ECU
andEFIorECDNo. 1 fuse,EFIorECDNo. 1 fuseandbattery.

Check the harness and the connector between the EFI or
ECDNo. 1 fuseandtheenginecontrolECU:
PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the EFI or ECD No. 1 fuse from the engine room

J/B.
(b) Disconnect the E11 engine control ECU connector.
CHECK:
Measure the resistance between the wire harness side connec-

tor.
OK:

Tester Connection Specified Condition

Engine Room J/B (EFI or ECD No. 1
fuse terminal2) −

BATT(E11 −3)
Below1 �

Engine Room J/B (EFI or ECD No. 1
fuse terminal 2) or

BATT(E11 −3) − Bodyground
10k � orhigher

Check the harness and connector between the EFI or ECD
No. 1 fuseandthebattery:
PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the EFI or ECD No. 1 fuse from the engine room

J/B.
(b) Disconnect the battery positive terminal.
CHECK:
Measure the resistance between the wire harness side connec-
tor.
OK:

Tester Connection Specified Condition

Engine Room J/B (EFI or ECD No. 1
fuse terminal1) −

Battery positive terminal
Below1 �

Engine Room J/B (EFI or ECD No. 1
fuse terminal 1) or

Batterypositive terminal − Bodyground
10k � orhigher

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Check and replace engine room J/B.


